West Virginia, session 2026, HB4276.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Attorney General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 12, 1985, authorized under the authority of §61-11A-6 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (fair treatment of crime victims and witnesses, 142 CSR 04), is authorized with the amendment set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.5. to read as follows:	"1.5. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036."